Washington statutes.
RCW 35.22.220

Repeal of separate designation.

Whenever any such city shall have passed such an ordinance providing for such separate designations and for filing for and election to office in accordance therewith, such city shall have no power to repeal the same except by ordinance passed by the council of such city and submitted to the voters thereof at a general or special election and ratified by a majority of the voters voting thereon.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.22.220. Prior: 1925 ex.s. c 61 s 2; RRS s 8948-2.]

NOTES:

Times for holding elections: RCW 29A.04.311 through 29A.04.330.